North Dakota statutes. TITLE 50 Public Welfare
CHAPTER 50-11 Foster Care Homes for Children and Adults
50-11-06.8.
Criminal history record investigation — Fingerprinting required.

Each facility providing foster care for children shall secure, from a law enforcement agency or any other agency authorized to take fingerprints, two sets of fingerprints and shall provide all other information necessary to secure state criminal history record information and a nationwide background check under federal law from:

Any individual employed by, or providing care in, the facility; and

Any adult living in the facility, but not being provided care in the facility.

Each identified relative, at the request by the department, shall secure, from a law enforcement agency or any other agency authorized to take fingerprints, two sets of fingerprints and shall provide all other information necessary to secure state criminal history record information and a nationwide background check under federal law from any adult living in the home of the identified relative.

The facility or identified relative shall assure that information obtained under subsections 1 and 2 is provided to the department.

Upon receipt of all fingerprints and necessary information relating to a criminal history record investigation, the department shall submit the information and fingerprints to the bureau of criminal investigation. The department shall provide a copy of the state criminal history record information response received from the bureau of criminal investigation to the facility, public agency, or authorized agent making the request.

The bureau of criminal investigation shall request a nationwide background check from the federal bureau of investigation and, upon receipt of a response, provide the response of the federal bureau of investigation to the department. The bureau of criminal investigation also shall provide any criminal history record information that may lawfully be made available under chapter 12-60 to the department.

Upon request by the operators of a facility, employees of a facility, or identified relative, a law enforcement agency shall take fingerprints of individuals described in this section if the request is made for purposes of this section.

The department shall pay the cost of securing fingerprints, any criminal history record information made available under chapter 12-60, and a nationwide background check for each facility providing foster care for children.

An agency that takes fingerprints as provided under this section may charge a reasonable fee to offset the costs of the fingerprinting.

Except as provided in sections 50-11-02.4 and 50-11-06.9, the department shall secure from a law enforcement agency or any other agency authorized to take fingerprints two sets of fingerprints and all other information necessary to secure state criminal history record information and a nationwide background check under federal law from:

Any individual employed by, or providing care in, an adult family foster care facility; and

Any adult living in an adult family foster care facility, but not being provided care in the facility.

A criminal history record investigation completed under this section may be used to satisfy the criminal history record investigation requirements of sections 50-11.3-01 and 50-12-03.2.

Source:

S.L. 1997, ch. 408, § 2; 1999, ch. 282, § 20; 2001, ch. 423, §§ 3, 4; 2007, ch. 115, § 15; 2019, ch. 404, § 9, effective October 1, 2019; 2019, ch. 405, § 4, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 15 of chapter 115, S.L. 2007 became effective May 1, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 23 of chapter 115, S.L. 2007.

Note.

Section 50-11-06.8 was amended 2 times by the 2019 Legislative Assembly. Pursuant to Section 1-02-09.1, the section is printed above to harmonize and give effect to the changes made in Section 4 of Chapter 405, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1099; and Section 9 of Chapter 404, Session Laws 2019, House Bill 1102.

Section 7 of chapter 405, S.L. 2019 provides, “

IMPLEMENTATION CONTINGENT UPON APPROPRIATION - APPLICATION.

The department of human services is not required to implement or enforce sections 1, 2, 3, 4, and 6 of this Act with respect to agency foster home for adults and administration of routine medication if the legislative assembly does not provide an appropriation to support the implementation and enforcement of sections 1, 2, 3, 4, and 6 of this Act.”

50-11-06.9.
Criminal history record investigation for foster home for adults — When not required.

A criminal history record investigation may not be required, under section 50-11-06.8 or 50-11-02.4, of a foster home for adults licensed or approved on August 1, 1999, for so long as that home remains continuously licensed or approved.

Source:

S.L. 1999, ch. 282, § 22; 2001, ch. 423, § 5; 2007, ch. 115, § 16; 2019, ch. 405, § 5, effective August 1, 2019.

Effective Date.

The 2007 amendment of this section by section 16 of chapter 115, S.L. 2007 became effective May 1, 2007, pursuant to an emergency clause in section 23 of chapter 115, S.L. 2007.

50-11-06.10.
Identified relative — Criminal history record investigation.

The department may require an identified relative and any adult living in the home of the identified relative to go through a criminal history record investigation pursuant to section 50-11-06.8.

If the department requires a criminal history record investigation pursuant to subsection 1, the department shall consider an identified relative and any adult living in the home of the identified relative as a family foster home for children applicant, family foster home for children provider, or members of the family foster home for children for the purpose of determining the impact of the individual’s criminal history record investigation on the individual’s ability to provide foster care for children.

Source:

S.L. 2019, ch. 404, § 10, effective October 1, 2019.

50-11-06.11.
Unaccompanied undocumented children.

A person may not arrange for or promote care provided in a facility for unaccompanied undocumented children unless the facility has a license or approval issued by the department.

Source:

S.L. 2021, ch. 367, § 2, effective May 3, 2021.

50-11-07.
Denial or revocation of license.

The department may deny or revoke the license of any facility upon proper showing of any of the following:

Any of the conditions set forth in section 50-11-02 as prerequisites for the issuance of the license do not exist.

The application contains false or misleading material information or the applicant intentionally withheld material information.

The license was issued upon false, misleading, or intentionally withheld material information.

An operator, licensee, caregiver, employee, or an agent of the facility has violated a provision of this chapter or any of the rules of the department.

An operator, applicant, licensee, caregiver, employee, or agent of the facility has been convicted of an offense determined by the department to have a direct bearing upon the person’s ability to serve the public or residents of the facility, or the department determines, following conviction of any other offense, the person is not sufficiently rehabilitated under section 12.1-33-02.1.

Source:

S.L. 1915, ch. 183, § 7; 1923, ch. 161, § 3; 1925 Supp., § 5099b3; R.C. 1943, § 50-1107; S.L. 1969, ch. 419, § 13; 1977, ch. 130, § 63; 1993, ch. 472, § 22; 2003, ch. 414, § 1.

Cross-References.

Definition of offense, see

§ 12.1-01-04.

50-11-08.
Denial or revocation of license — Hearing — Appeals.

Before any application for a license under the provisions of this chapter is denied or before revocation of any such license takes place, written charges as to the specific reasons therefor, a copy of the statutes and department rules authorizing such action, and notice of the applicant’s or licensee’s right to a hearing on the matter before the department must be served upon the applicant or licensee. The applicant or licensee must also be notified in writing of the person’s right to be represented at such hearing by counsel, to examine all files and documents in the custody of the department regarding the applicant or licensee, to present witnesses at the hearing on behalf of the applicant or licensee and to present documentary evidence, to present testimony and cross-examine adverse witnesses, and the right to an impartial hearing officer. The applicant or licensee has the right to a hearing before the department if the hearing is requested within twenty days after service of the written charges. The department shall hold the hearing within sixty days after the hearing request unless the applicant or licensee agrees to a later date. At any such hearing, the evidence submitted by the department in support of its denial or revocation of the applicant’s or licensee’s license must be limited to supporting only those reasons which were given by the department in its original notice of denial or revocation to the applicant or licensee. An applicant or licensee may appeal under the provisions of chapter 28-32 any final decision of the department regarding the application for or issuance of a license required by this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 161, § 4; 1925 Supp., § 5099b4; R.C. 1943, § 50-1108; S.L. 1969, ch. 419, § 14; 1985, ch. 529, § 2; 1993, ch. 472, § 23.

50-11-09.
Appeal from decision of department denying or revoking license.

The applicant for a license to operate a facility or a person whose license for a facility has been revoked may appeal the denial or revocation to the district court. An appeal must be taken in the manner provided in chapter 28-32.

Source:

S.L. 1923, ch. 161, § 5; 1925 Supp., § 5099b5; R.C. 1943, § 50-1109; S.L. 1969, ch. 419, § 15; 1993, ch. 472, § 24.

50-11-09.1.
District court injunctions.

The department may petition the district court for an injunction to stop or prevent a violation of this chapter or of administrative rules adopted under this chapter.

Source:

S.L. 2001, ch. 424, § 1.

50-11-10.
Penalty.

Any person, whether owner, manager, operator, or representative of any owner, operator, or manager, who violates any of the provisions of this chapter, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

Source:

S.L. 1915, ch. 183, § 14; 1923, ch. 161, § 9; 1925 Supp., § 5099b9; S.L. 1939, ch. 193, § 2; R.C. 1943, § 50-1110; S.L. 1969, ch. 419, § 16; 1975, ch. 106, § 539.